Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3101
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-3101 to 13-3110 shall be known and may be cited as the Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act.

Laws 2010, LB779, § 7;

Laws 2024, LB1197, § 1.